Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7770.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-12-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-12 entitled "Minimum
Wages" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-12-3. Minimum wages.
(a) Every employer shall pay to each of the employer’s employees: commencing July 1,
1999, at least the minimum wage of five dollars and sixty-five cents ($5.65) per hour. Commencing
September 1, 2000, the minimum wage is six dollars and fifteen cents ($6.15) per hour.
(b) Commencing January 1, 2004, the minimum wage is six dollars and seventy-five cents
($6.75) per hour.
(c) Commencing March 1, 2006, the minimum wage is seven dollars and ten cents ($7.10)
per hour.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2007, the minimum wage is seven dollars and forty cents
($7.40) per hour.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2013, the minimum wage is seven dollars and seventy-five
cents ($7.75) per hour.
(f) Commencing January 1, 2014, the minimum wage is eight dollars ($8.00) per hour.
(g) Commencing January 1, 2015, the minimum wage is nine dollars ($9.00) per hour.
(h) Commencing January 1, 2016, the minimum wage is nine dollars and sixty cents ($9.60)
per hour.
(i) Commencing January 1, 2018, the minimum wage is ten dollars and ten cents ($10.10)

per hour.
(j) Commencing January 1, 2019, the minimum wage is ten dollars and fifty cents ($10.50)
per hour.
(k) Commencing October 1, 2020, the minimum wage is eleven dollars and fifty cents
($11.50) per hour.
(l) Commencing January 1, 2022, the minimum wage is twelve dollars and twenty-five
cents ($12.25) per hour.
(m) Commencing January 1, 2023, the minimum wage is thirteen dollars ($13.00) per hour.
(n) Commencing January 1, 2024, the minimum wage is fourteen dollars ($14.00) per hour.
(o) Commencing January 1, 2025, the minimum wage is fifteen dollars ($15.00) per hour.
(p) Commencing January 1, 2026, the minimum wage is sixteen dollars ($16.00) per hour.
(q) Commencing January 1, 2027, the minimum wage is seventeen dollars ($17.00) per
hour.
(r) Commencing January 1, 2029, the minimum wage shall be increased by an amount
equal to the total percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-
U) published by the United States Department of Labor Bureau of Labor Statistics for the Northeast
Region for the calendar year 2027, but in no event shall the minimum wage decrease to reflect any
decrease in the CPI-U.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005268
========
LC005268 - Page 2 of 3